Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1693.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 29 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding parts to read:PART IPRELIMINARY PROVISIONS(Reserved)PART IIIMMIGRATIONChapter21. Immigration Compliance and Public SafetyCHAPTER 21IMMIGRATION COMPLIANCE AND PUBLIC SAFETYSec.1234567891011121314151617 2101. Scope of chapter.2102. Definitions.2103. Preemption.2104. Enforcement.§ 2101. Scope of chapter.This chapter relates to immigration compliance and public safety.§ 2102. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Alien offender." An alien who avoided arrest, detention, prosecution or deportation proceedings as a proximate result of the failure of a municipal official to comply with section 2103(a) (relating to preemption)."Child." An unemancipated individual who is under 18 years of age."Corrections officer." As defined in 61 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions)."Family member." With respect to an individual, any of the following:(1) Another individual who is related to the individual within the third degree of consanguinity or affinity.(2) Another individual who maintains a common-law relationship with the individual.(3) Another individual who resides in the same household as the individual.(4) A stepbrother, stepsister, stepchild, stepparent or fiancé of the individual."Immigration detainer request." A request by a Federal 20250HB1693PN2080 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 agency to maintain temporary custody of an alien, including a United States Department of Homeland Security Form I-247 document or a similar or successor form."Individual adversely affected." Any of the following:(1) An individual against whom a crime was committed if the perpetrator of the crime wa s an alien offender. (2) A parent or legal guardian of a child against whom a crime was committed if the perpetrator of the crime was an alien offender . (3) A family member of a homicide victim, if the perpetrator of the homicide wa s an alien offender. "Judicial officer." Any of the following:(1) A judge as defined in 42 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions).(2) A judicial officer as defined in 42 Pa.C.S. § 102."Judicial staff." Administrative staff as defined in 42 Pa.C.S. § 102."Law enforcement agency." Any of the following:(1) The Office of Attorney General.(2) A district attorney's office.(3) An agency that employs a law enforcement officer."Law enforcement officer." Any of the following:(1) An officer of the United States, of another state or political subdivision thereof or of the Commonwealth or political subdivision thereof who is empowered by law to make arrests for offenses, whether that duty extends to all offenses or is limited to specific offenses.(2) An attorney authorized by law to prosecute or participate in the prosecution of offenses."Municipal official." An individual who holds an office or 20250HB1693PN2080 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 position under a municipality or a municipal government association and is paid on a regular salary or per diem basis."Municipality." A county, city, borough, incorporated town, township, home rule municipality, optional plan municipality, optional charter municipality or any similar general purpose unit of government that may be created or authorized by statute."Parole officer." Any of the following:(1) An agent as defined in 61 Pa.C.S. § 6101 (relating to definitions).(2) An officer as defined in 61 Pa.C.S. § 6302 (relating to definitions)."Policy." Any ordinance, resolution, regulation, rule, practice or other action, whether formal or informal, promulgated or enforced by a municipality."Reasonable expenses." Attorney fees, expert witness fees and court costs.§ 2103. Preemption.(a) Immigration policies preempted.--A municipal official may not adopt or enforce a policy that prohibits or materially limits a law enforcement agency, law enforcement officer, corrections officer, parole officer, judicial officer or judicial staff from complying with section 2104 (relating to enforcement).(b) Cause of action against municipal officials established.--Notwithstanding the provisions of 42 Pa.C.S. §§ 8545 (relating to official liability generally), 8546 (relating to defense of official immunity), 8548 (relating to indemnity) and 8549 (relating to limitation on damages), an individual adversely affected shall have a cause of action against the municipal official who violated subsection (a).20250HB1693PN2080 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Reasonable expenses and damages.--If an individual adversely affected is declared a prevailing party, the court:(1) Shall award all of the following to the individual adversely affected:(i) Reasonable expenses. (ii) Actual damages.(2) May award any of the following to the individual adversely affected:(i) P unitive damages. (ii) Consequential damages.(iii) Damages for past and future loss of earnings and earning capacity.(iv) Damages for loss of consortium.(v) Damages for pain and suffering.§ 2104. Enforcement.(a) Duty to cooperate with Federal immigration requests.--Except as provided in subsection (b):(1) A law enforcement agenc y, municipality or municipal official that has custody of an individual subject to an immigration detainer request issued by United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement shall:(i) Comply with, honor and fulfill any request made in the immigration detainer request.(ii) Inform the individual that the individual is being held pursuant to an immigration detainer request issued by the Federal Government.(2) A law enforceme nt agency, municipality or municipal official shall provide any in formation requested by United States Citizenship and Immigration Services, United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement or another Federal agency 20250HB1693PN2080 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 relating to the immigration status of an individual in the custody of the law enforcement a gency, municipality or municipal official, including information relating to the name and date and place of birth of the individual. (b) Exception.--Subsection (a) shall not apply if an individual provides proof that the individual is a citizen of the United States or has lawful immigration status in the United States.(c) Immunity.--A law enforcement officer or municipal official who, in good faith, relies on information contained in an immigration detainer request or other information provided by the Federal Government relating to an individual's immigration status shall be immune from civil or criminal liability for any actions taken to comply with the duties and requirements under subsection (a).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1693PN2080 - 6 - 12345678910111213141516